dicts/cop_EG/cop_EG.aff
PFX p Y 383
PFX p 0 /V/A/B/C/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E . REL_PRONOUN_M
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E . REL_PRONOUN_F
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E . REL_PRONOUN_P
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲓ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁϥⲑ̀ⲣⲓ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁϥⲑ̀ⲣⲓ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲓ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧ . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲕ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲉⲕ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉϥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲉϥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲉⲥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲩⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲑ̀ⲣⲟⲩ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲣⲟⲩ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲕ . [TILL_NOT_1PSG]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉ .  [TILL_NOT_2PSG]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉϥ .  [TILL_NOT_3PSGM]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲥ .  [TILL_NOT_3PSGF]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲛ .  [TILL_NOT_1PPL]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ .  [TILL_NOT_1PPL]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲑ̀ⲣⲟⲩ .  [TILL_NOT_2PPL]
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛⲉ̀ⲑⲣⲟⲩ .  [TILL_NOT_3PPL]
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧ/E . REL_PRONOUN_M
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉ/E [ϯ]
PFX p 0 ⲛⲉⲧ . REL_PRONOUN_P
PFX p 0 ⲁ . IMPERATIVE
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲣ . NEG_IMPERATIVE
PFX p 0 ϯ/E . PRESENT1_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉϯ/E . PRESENT1_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲕ̀ [ⲓⲟⲙ] (ex:ⲙⲉⲩⲓ,ⲙⲟⲧⲉⲛ,ⲓⲣⲓ,ⲓⲛⲓ,ⲟϩⲓ)
PFX p 0 ⲕ̀ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲕ̀ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲭ̀ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲭ̀ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉ . PRESENT1_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ϥ̀ . PRESENT1_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲥ̀ . PRESENT1_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲛ . PRESENT1_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . PRESENT1_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲥⲉ/E . PRESENT1_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲥⲉ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ϯ . NEG_PRESENT1_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲕ̀ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] NEG_PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲕ̀ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] NEG_PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲭ̀ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] NEG_PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲭ̀ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] NEG_PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉ . NEG_PRESENT1_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ϥ̀ . NEG_PRESENT1_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲛ̀ϥ̀ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲥ̀ . NEG_PRESENT1_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_PRESENT1_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_PRESENT1_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲥⲉ . NEG_PRESENT1_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲓ/E . PRESENT2_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁⲓ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲕ/E . PRESENT2_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲁⲭ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁⲕ .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉ/E . PRESENT2_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁϥ/E . PRESENT2_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁϥ .
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁϥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲥ/E . PRESENT2_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁⲥ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲁⲛ/E . PRESENT2_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . PRESENT2_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲩ/E . PRESENT2_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁⲩ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲓ . NEG_PRESENT2_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲕ . NEG_PRESENT2_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲣⲉ . NEG_PRESENT2_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁϥ . NEG_PRESENT2_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲥ . NEG_PRESENT2_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲛ . NEG_PRESENT2_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_PRESENT2_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲩ . NEG_PRESENT2_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲓ/E . PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲕ/E . PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉ . PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉϥ/E . PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲥ/E . PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲛ/E . PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲩ/E . PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉϯ/E . ET_PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲕ/E . ET_PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲕ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉ/E . ET_PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉϥ/E . ET_PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉϥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲥ/E . ET_PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲥ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . ET_PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . ET_PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲟⲩ/E . ET_PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲟⲩ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉϯ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲕ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉϥ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲥ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲟⲩ/E . VYET_PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉϯ/E . TYET_PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉⲕ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉϥ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉⲥ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲧⲟⲩ/E . THYET_PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉϯ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲕ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉϥ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲥ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲟⲩ/E . NYET_PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁ .  FUTUR1_NOUN
PFX p 0 ⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E .  ET_FUTUR1_NOUN
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E .  
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲑⲛⲁ/E .  PET_FUTUR1_NOUN
PFX p 0 ϯⲛⲁ/E . FUTUR1_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉϯⲛⲁ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉϯⲛⲁ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲭ̀ⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲣⲁ .
PFX p 0 ϥ̀ⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲥ̀ⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲥⲉⲛⲁ . FUTUR1_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ϯⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲭ̀ⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ϥ̀ⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲥ̀ⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲛ̀ⲥ̀ⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲥⲉⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR1_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲓⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲁⲭⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲁⲕⲛⲁ . ex:ⲁⲕⲛⲁϣⲉ
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁϥⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁϥⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁϥⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲁⲥⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲩⲛⲁ . FUTUR2_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲓⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲭⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲣⲉⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁϥⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲥⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲁⲩⲛⲁ . NEG_FUTUR2_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲓⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲭⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲕⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉϥⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲥⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲩⲛⲁ . FUTUR3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉϯⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉϯⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲕⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲕⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲕⲛⲁ .
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲕⲛⲁ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉϥⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉϥⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉϥⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉϥⲛⲁ . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲥⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ .
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲟⲩⲛⲁ . ET_FUTUR3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲟⲩⲛⲁ/E . ET_FUTUR3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲟⲩⲛⲁ . PET_FUTUR3_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲟⲩⲛⲁ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . PERFECT_AFFIRM_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲓ . NEG_PERFECT_1PSG 
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲕ . NEG_PERFECT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉ . NEG_PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉϥ . NEG_PERFECT_3PSGM   
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲥ . NEG_PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲛ . NEG_PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲟⲩ . NEG_PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲙ̀ⲡⲟⲩ . 
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲓ/E . PRE-PERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲕ/E . PRE-PERFECT_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉ/E . PRE-PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁϥ/E . PRE-PERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲥ/E . PRE-PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲛ/E . PRE-PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . PRE-PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲧⲁⲩ/E . PRE-PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲓ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲕ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁϥ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲥ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲛ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁⲩ/E . VY_PRE-PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲓ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲕ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁϥ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲥ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲛ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲩ/E . THY_PRE-PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲓ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲕ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁϥ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲥ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲛ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲩ/E . NY_PRE-PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲓ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲕ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_2PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁϥ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲥ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲛ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲉⲧⲁⲩ . NEG_PRE-PERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲁ . SUBJUNC_THAT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲕ . SUBJUNC_THAT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉ . SUBJUNC_THAT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉϥ . SUBJUNC_THAT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲥ . SUBJUNC_THAT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_THAT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_THAT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲟⲩ . SUBJUNC_THAT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ/E .
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲥⲉϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲁϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲕϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉϥϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲥϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲛϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲧⲟⲩϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . SUBJUNC_MAY_NOT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛϯ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_1PSG
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉⲕ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲣⲉ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉϥ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉⲥ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_1PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛⲧⲟⲩ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁϯ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_1PSG
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲉⲕ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲣⲉ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲉϥ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲉⲥ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_1PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_2PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲧⲟⲩ . SUBJUNC_UNTIL_3PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲓ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_1PSG
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲕ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲣⲉ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁϥ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲥ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲛ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_1PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_2PPL
PFX p 0 ϣⲁⲩ/E . HAB_PRES_AFFIRM_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲓ . HAB_PRES_NEG_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲕ . HAB_PRES_NEG_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲣⲉ . HAB_PRES_NEG_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁϥ . HAB_PRES_NEG_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲥ . HAB_PRES_NEG_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲛ . HAB_PRES_NEG_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . HAB_PRES_NEG_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲩ . HAB_PRES_NEG_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲓ/E . IMPERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲕ/E . IMPERFECT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉ/E . IMPERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁϥ/A/E . IMPERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲥ/C/E . IMPERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲛⲁⲥ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲛ/E . IMPERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . IMPERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲩ/E . IMPERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲓⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲉⲕⲉ/T . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲕⲉ .
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉϥⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲉⲥⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲉⲛⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲉⲩⲉ . EMPH_FUT_AFFIRM_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲁ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉⲕ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉϥ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉⲥ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉⲛ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲉⲧⲉⲛ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲟⲩ . NEG_EMPH_FUT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲓⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲭⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁϥⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲛⲁϥⲛⲁ/E . 
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲥⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲛⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲁⲩⲛⲁ/E . FUT_IMPERFECT_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁϯ . BEFORE_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉⲕ . BEFORE_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉ . BEFORE_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉϥ . BEFORE_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉⲥ . BEFORE_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉⲛ . BEFORE_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . BEFORE_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙ̀ⲡⲁⲧⲟⲩ . BEFORE_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ . PLU_PERFECT_AFFIRM_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲓ . OPTATIVE_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉⲕ . OPTATIVE_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉ . OPTATIVE_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉϥ . OPTATIVE_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉⲥ . OPTATIVE_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉⲛ . OPTATIVE_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . OPTATIVE_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲙⲁⲣⲟⲩ . OPTATIVE_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲓϣⲁⲛ . COND_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲁⲕϣⲁⲛ . COND_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉϣⲁⲛ . COND_2PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁϥϣⲁⲛ . COND_3PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧⲁϥϣⲁⲛ . 
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁϥϣⲁⲛ .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲥϣⲁⲛ . COND_3PSGF
PFX p 0 ⲁⲛϣⲁⲛ . COND_1PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛϣⲁⲛ . COND_2PPL
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛϣⲁⲛ . 
PFX p 0 ⲁⲩϣⲁⲛ . COND_3PPL
PFX p 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧⲁⲩϣⲁⲛ .
PFX p 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲁⲩϣⲁⲛ .
PFX p 0 ⲁⲓϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_1PSG
PFX p 0 ⲁⲕϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_2PSGM
PFX p 0 ⲁⲣⲉϣ̀ⲧⲉⲙ . NEG_COND_2PSGF
